Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4425.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "sustainable aviation
fuel incentive program act".
Sec. 3. As used in this act:
(a) "Aviation fuel" means fuel as that term is defined in
section 4 of the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA
327, MCL 259.4.
(b) "Biomass" means any organic matter that is available on a
KAS H01436'25 (H-4) txiu1a


renewable or recurring basis, including agricultural crops and
trees; wood and wood waste and residues; plants, including aquatic
plants, grasses, residues, and fibers; animal fat; and the organic
portion of solid wastes.
(c) "Department" means the department of environment, Great
Lakes, and energy.
(d) "Greenhouse gas" means carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous
oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, or sulfur
hexafluoride.
(e) "Income tax act of 1967" means the income tax act of 1967,
1967 PA 281, MCL 206.1 to 206.847.
(f) "Qualified sustainable aviation fuel" means aviation fuel
that the department certifies, based upon evidence submitted by the
applicant under section 5, meets the definition of sustainable
aviation fuel and satisfies the requirements in subsection (1) of
the sustainable aviation fuel tax credit.
(g) "Qualified taxpayer" means that term as defined under
section 678 of the income tax act of 1967, MCL 206.678.
(h) "Sustainable aviation fuel" means aviation fuel that
satisfies all of the following:
(i) Except as otherwise provided under this subparagraph, is
derived from biomass, waste streams, renewable or zero emissions
energy sources, or gaseous carbon oxides. Beginning January 1,
2030, the aviation fuel must be derived from domestic feedstock
resources and must not be derived from coprocessing an applicable
material, or materials derived from an applicable material, with a
feedstock that is not biomass.
(ii) Meets the requirements of the ASTM International D7566
"Standard Specification for Aviation Turbine Fuel Containing
KAS H01436'25 (H-4) txiu1a


Synthesized Hydrocarbons" or D1655 "Standard Specification for
Aviation Turbine Fuels".
(iii) Achieves at least a 50% life-cycle greenhouse gas
emissions reduction in comparison with petroleum-based aviation
fuel, as determined by any of the following:
(A) The most recent life-cycle methodology for calculating the
life-cycle emissions of sustainable aviation fuels adopted by the
International Civil Aviation Organization with the agreement of the
United States.
(B) The most recent version of the Argonne National
Laboratory's Greenhouse gases, Regulated Emissions, and Energy use
in Technologies (GREET) model, inclusive of, but not limited to,
climate smart agricultural practices, on-site renewables, and
carbon capture and sequestration.
(C) Any other model the department approves to calculate life-
cycle greenhouse gas emissions for sustainable aviation fuel.
(i) "Sustainable aviation fuel incentive program" or "program"
means the program created under section 5.
(j) "Sustainable aviation fuel tax credit" means the tax
credit allowed under section 678 of the income tax act of 1967, MCL
206.678.
(k) "Tax year" means that term as defined in section 611 of
the income tax act of 1967, MCL 206.611.
Sec. 5. (1) The department shall create a sustainable aviation
fuel incentive program to encourage persons engaged in the business
of producing aviation fuel to produce more sustainable aviation
fuel in this state. The department shall administer the program and
develop and use an application, approval, and certification process
for the approval of sustainable aviation fuel tax credits and make
KAS H01436'25 (H-4) txiu1a


that process available on the department's website.
(2) A person seeking to claim a sustainable aviation fuel tax
credit shall, within 2 months after the close of the person's tax
year and in a form and manner as prescribed by the department,
submit an application to the department for approval and
certification of the number of gallons of sustainable aviation fuel
that satisfies the requirements in subsection (1) of the
sustainable aviation fuel tax credit, and the amount of the
sustainable aviation fuel tax credit allowed to be claimed by the
applicant. The applicant must submit all of the following with the
application required under this subsection:
(a) Evidence that the person is engaged in the business of
producing or blending sustainable aviation fuel in this state and
that the sustainable aviation fuel sold during the tax year for
which the credit is sought to be claimed satisfies the requirements
in subsection (1) of the sustainable aviation fuel tax credit.
(b) Evidence that the aviation fuel is sustainable aviation
fuel and, for a person seeking the increased credit under
subsection (2) of the sustainable aviation fuel tax credit,
evidence of the total percentage reduction in life-cycle greenhouse
gas emissions above 50%.
(c) Copies of each purchaser's certification that the
sustainable aviation fuel purchased in this state from that person
was purchased for use as fuel in an aircraft departing from an
airport in this state.
(3) For purposes of the purchaser's certification required
under subsection (2)(c), if the purchaser is a wholly owned
subsidiary of an airline operator, the purchaser may make the
certification required under subsection (2)(c) based on information
KAS H01436'25 (H-4) txiu1a


from the airline operator that the sustainable aviation fuel was
purchased for use in an aircraft departing from an airport in this
state. If a purchaser makes a certification required under
subsection (2)(c) that it knows or has reason to know is false, any
person responsible for preparing or submitting that certification
is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more
than 1 year, a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. A
purchaser that is a wholly owned subsidiary of an airline operator
that makes a certification required under subsection (2)(c) based
on information from that airline operator is deemed to have the
same knowledge of the accuracy of such information as the airline
operator.
(4) Subject to the limitation under section 7, not later than
30 days after receipt of an application submitted under this
section, the department shall approve, reject, or request
additional information if deemed necessary. If additional
information is requested, the applicant has 30 days upon receipt of
the notification from the department to submit the additional
information. If the applicant fails to submit the additional
information requested within 30 days after being notified that
additional information was needed, the application is considered
abandoned and rejected. If an application is rejected by the
department, the department must notify the applicant in writing and
include the reasons for the rejection. If an application is
approved, the department must issue a certificate to the applicant.
The certificate required under this subsection must state all of
the following:
(a) The person is a qualified taxpayer.
(b) The sustainable aviation fuel for which the credit is
KAS H01436'25 (H-4) txiu1a


being claimed by the qualified taxpayer is qualified sustainable
aviation fuel.
(c) The total amount of the qualified sustainable aviation
fuel and the maximum amount of the sustainable aviation fuel tax
credit allowed to be claimed by the qualified taxpayer for the
designated tax year.
(d) The taxpayer's federal employer identification number or
the Michigan department of treasury number assigned to the
taxpayer.
Sec. 7. The department shall not approve and certify more than
$4,500,000.00 in sustainable aviation fuel tax credits under the
program during the 2025-2026 state fiscal year. For each state
fiscal year after the 2025-2026 state fiscal year through the 2035-
2036 state fiscal year, the maximum amount allowed to be approved
and certified under the program during a state fiscal year is
$9,000,000.00. The department shall not approve an application and
issue a new certificate for a sustainable aviation fuel tax credit
under section 5 after December 31, 2035.
Sec. 9. (1) Not later than January 1, 2027 and each January 1
thereafter through January 1, 2037, the department shall submit a
report to the senate energy and environment committee, the house of
representatives energy committee, the senate and house of
representatives appropriations committees, and the senate and house
of representatives fiscal agencies on the operation and
effectiveness of the program for the immediately preceding fiscal
year.
(2) The report under subsection (1) must include all of the
following information:
(a) The total amount of sustainable aviation fuel tax credits
KAS H01436'25 (H-4) txiu1a


certified under the program.
(b) The number of applications received and the number
approved during the fiscal year.
Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless House
Bill No. 4424 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.
Final Page
KAS H01436'25 (H-4) txiu1a